North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131C. Charitable Solicitation Licensure Act. [Repealed]
§§ 131C-1 through 131C-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 759, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to solicitation of contributions, see now

G.S. 131F-1

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1994 Extra Session, c. 24, s. 14(c), effective October 1, 1994, amended the effective date of the amendment to G.S. 131C-22 made by Session Laws 1993, c. 539, s. 952.

Session Laws 1989, c. 566, s. 4 repealed former G.S. 131C-17.2, effective October 1, 1989.

G.S. 131C-22 would have been repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 759, s. 1, effective January 1, 1995.